Montana, session 2025, HB648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-1-217, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-1-217. Policy for management of large predators -- legislative intent. (1) In managing large
predators, the primary goals of the department, in the order of listed priority, are to:
(a) protect humans, livestock, and pets;
(b) preserve and enhance the safety of the public during outdoor recreational and livelihood
activities; and
(c) preserve citizens' opportunities to hunt large game species.
(2) With regard to large predators, it is the intent of the legislature that the specific provisions of
this section concerning the management of large predators will control the general supervisory authority of the
department regarding the management of all wildlife.
(3) For the management of wolves in accordance with the priorities established in subsection (1),
the department may use lethal action to take problem wolves that attack livestock if the state objective for
breeding pairs has been met. For the purposes of this subsection, "problem wolves" means any individual wolf
or pack of wolves with a history of livestock predation.
(4) The department shall work with the livestock loss board and the United States department of
agriculture wildlife services to establish the conditions under which carcasses or parts of carcasses from wolves
or mountain lions are retrieved during management activities and when those carcasses or parts of carcasses
are made available to the livestock loss board for sale or auction pursuant to 2-15-3113.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 648
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 648
(5) (a) The department shall ensure that county commissioners and tribal governments in areas
that have identifiable populations of large predators have the opportunity for consultation and coordination with
state and federal agencies prior to state and federal policy decisions involving large predators and large game
species.
(b) The department shall provide verbal and written notice to the county commissioners,
sheriff's office, and tribal government located within the county or tribal government boundaries where a large
predator is to be relocated:
(i) on the finalization of an annual plan to relocate a large predator into a county or tribal
government boundary other than the one it was captured in;
(ii) on the finalization of a change to a plan to relocate a large predator into a county or tribal
government boundary other than the one it was captured in;
(iii) within 24 hours of the capture of a large predator if it will be relocated into a county or tribal
government boundary other than the one it was captured in; and
(iv) within 24 hours of the relocation of a large predator if the relocation site has been previously
approved by the commission for relocation of bears.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "consultation" means to actively provide information to a county or tribal government regarding
proposed policy decisions on matters that may have a harmful effect on agricultural production or livestock
operations or that may pose a risk to human health or safety in that county or on those tribal lands and to seek
information and advice from counties or tribal governments on these matters;
(b) "large game species" means deer, elk, mountain sheep, moose, antelope, and mountain goats;
and
(c) "large predators" means bears, mountain lions, and wolves."
Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 648
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 648, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 648
INTRODUCED BY B. LER, E. ALBUS, R. GREGG, C. COCHRAN, S. GIST, R. MINER, J. SCHILLINGER, N.
DURAM, Z. WIRTH, S. MANESS
AN ACT REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH, WILDLIFE, AND PARKS TO NOTIFY COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS, SHERIFF'S OFFICES, AND TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS BEFORE THE RELEASE OF A
LARGE PREDATOR; AND AMENDING SECTION 87-1-217, MCA.”